Utah statutes.
39-4-6.   Forces of another state in fresh pursuit may make arrests.
Any military forces or organization, unit or detachment thereof, of another
state who are in fresh pursuit of insurrectionists, saboteurs, enemies or
enemy forces may continue such pursuit into this state until the military or
police forces of this state or the forces of the United States have had a
reasonable opportunity to take up the pursuit or to apprehend or capture such
persons and are authorized to arrest or capture such persons within this state
while in fresh pursuit. Any such person who shall be captured or arrested by
the military forces of such other state while in this state shall without
unnecessary delay be surrendered to the military or police forces of this
state to be dealt with according to law. This section shall not be construed
so as to make unlawful any arrest in this state which would otherwise be
lawful, and nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to repeal any of
the provisions of the Uniform Act on the Fresh Pursuit of Criminals.
